Ohio, session 136, HB948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4507.11, 4508.02, and 4511.522 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4507.11. (A)(1) Except as provided in section 4507.112 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor vehicles shall conduct all necessary examinations of applicants for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, motorcycle operators' endorsements, or motor-driven cycle or motor scooter endorsements. The examination shall include a test of the applicant's knowledge of motor vehicle laws, including the laws governing stopping for school buses, safely operating a motor vehicle adjacent to pedestrians and bicyclists, including those operating electric bicycles, and use of an electronic wireless communications device while operating a motor vehicle, a test of the applicant's physical fitness to drive, and a test of the applicant's ability to understand highway traffic control devices. The registrar may conduct the examination in such a manner that applicants who are illiterate or limited in their knowledge of the English language are tested by methods that would indicate to the examining officer that the applicant has a reasonable knowledge of motor vehicle laws and understands highway traffic control devices. (2) An applicant for a driver's license shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle by driving a motor vehicle under the supervision of an examining officer; however, no applicant for a driver's license shall use a low-speed or under-speed vehicle or a mini-truck for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control over a vehicle. The demonstration shall consist of a maneuverability test and a road test. The director of public safety shall determine the formats of the tests. (3) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer. However, no applicant for such an endorsement or restricted license shall use a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle. (4) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer. (5) Except as provided in sections 4507.112 and 4507.12 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall designate the highway patrol, any law enforcement body, or any other employee of the department of public safety to supervise and conduct examinations for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, and motorcycle operators' endorsements and shall provide the necessary rules and forms to properly conduct the examinations. A deputy registrar shall forward to the registrar the records of the examinations, together with the application for a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. If in the opinion of the registrar the applicant is qualified to operate a motor vehicle, the registrar shall issue the permit, license, or endorsement. (6) The registrar may authorize the highway patrol, other designated law enforcement body, or other designated employee of the department of public safety to issue an examiner's driving permit to an applicant who has passed the required examination, authorizing that applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the registrar is completing an investigation relative to that applicant's qualifications to receive a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. The applicant shall keep the examiner's driving permit in the applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle. The examiner's driving permit is effective until final action and notification has been given by the registrar, but in no event longer than sixty days from its date of issuance. (B)(1) An applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. An applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. Upon presentation of the form described in division (B)(1) of this section and compliance with all other requirements relating to the issuance of a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant the endorsement or restricted license, as the case may be. (2) A person who has not attained eighteen years of age and presents an application for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license under division (B)(1) of this section also shall comply with the requirements of section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. (C) A person who holds a valid motorcycle endorsement or restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle may operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter with that endorsement or restricted license. Sec. 4508.02. (A)(1) The director of public safety, subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and prescribe such rules concerning the administration and enforcement of this chapter as are necessary to protect the public. The rules shall require an assessment of the holder of a probationary instructor license. The director shall inspect the school facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and examine applicants for instructor's licenses. (2) The director shall adopt rules governing online driver education courses that may be completed via the internet to satisfy the classroom instruction under division (C) of this section. The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Establish standards that an online driver training enterprise must satisfy to be licensed to offer an online driver education course via the internet, including, at a minimum, proven expertise in providing driver education and an acceptable infrastructure capable of providing secure online driver education in accord with advances in internet technology. The rules shall allow an online driver training enterprise to be affiliated with a licensed driver training school offering in-person classroom instruction, but shall not require such an affiliation. (b) Establish content requirements that an online driver education course must satisfy to be approved as equivalent to twenty-four hours of in-person classroom instruction; (c) Establish attendance standards, including a maximum number of course hours that may be completed in a twenty-four-hour period; (d) Allow an enrolled applicant to begin the required eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction upon completing all twenty-four hours of course instruction; (e) Establish any other requirements necessary to regulate online driver education. (B) The director shall administer and enforce this chapter. (C) The rules shall require twenty-four hours of completed in-person classroom instruction or the completion of an approved, equivalent online driver education course offered via the internet by a licensed online driver training enterprise, followed by eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction conducted on public streets and highways of this state for all beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles who are required to complete the training under section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. The rules shall allow beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles to complete the driver education course at any point while holding a valid temporary instruction permit. The rules also shall require the classroom instruction or online driver education course for such drivers to include instruction on both all of the following: (1) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while distracted, including while using an electronic wireless communications device, or engaging in any other activity that distracts a driver from the safe and effective operation of a motor vehicle; (2) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a controlled substance, prescription medication, or alcohol; (3) The laws for sharing the roadway with a pedestrian and the operator of a bicycle or an electric bicycle, including hand and arm signals, right-of-way rules, and passing protocols. (D) The rules shall state the minimum hours for classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction required for beginning drivers of commercial trucks, commercial cars, buses, and commercial tractors, trailers, and semitrailers. (E)(1) The department of public safety may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise in an amount sufficient to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in the regulation of online driver education courses. (2) The department shall supply to each licensed online driver training enterprise certificates to be used for certifying an applicant's enrollment in an approved online driver education course and a separate certificate to be issued upon successful completion of an approved online driver education course. The certificates shall be numbered serially. The department may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise per certificate supplied to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in supplying the certificates. (F) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing an abbreviated driver training course for adults. Sec. 4511.522. (A)(1) On and after January 1, 2020, manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall permanently affix a label, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The label shall specify whether the electric bicycle is a class 1, class 2, or class 3 electric bicycle, the top assisted speed that the electric bicycle is capable of reaching, and the motor wattage of the electric bicycle. (2) No person shall modify an electric bicycle in a manner that changes the top assisted speed that the electric bicycle is capable of reaching unless the person also modifies the label required under division (A)(1) of this section to reflect the modification. (3) No person shall sell at retail an electric bicycle without giving the purchaser, either on paper or electronically, a copy of the educational leaflet or pamphlet created by the department of transportation under division (F) of this section. (B)(1) The manufacturer of an electric bicycle shall ensure that the electric bicycle complies with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles established by the consumer product safety commission under 16 C.F.R. 1512 et seq. (2) The manufacturer shall manufacture all class 1 electric bicycles and class 3 electric bicycles so that when the rider ceases pedaling the electric motor ceases to provide assistance. The manufacturer shall manufacture all class 2 electric bicycles so that when the rider applies the brakes or releases or activates a switch or similar mechanism the electric motor ceases to provide assistance. (3) All class 3 electric bicycles shall be equipped with a speedometer that displays the speed of the electric bicycle in miles per hour. (C)(1) The operation of a class 1 electric bicycle and a class 2 electric bicycle is permitted on a path set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or on a shared-use path, unless the county, township, municipal corporation, other local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule prohibits the use of a class 1 electric bicycle or class 2 electric bicycle on such a path. (2) No person shall operate a class 3 electric bicycle on a path set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or a shared-use path unless that path is within or adjacent to a highway or the county, township, municipal corporation, or local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule authorizes the use of a class 3 electric bicycle on such a path. (3) No person shall operate a class 1 electric bicycle, a class 2 electric bicycle, or a class 3 electric bicycle on a path that is intended to be used primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use, unless the county, township, municipal corporation, other local authority, or state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code with control over the path by resolution, ordinance, or rule authorizes the use of a class 1 electric bicycle, a class 2 electric bicycle, or a class 3 electric bicycle on such a path. (4) Divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section do not apply to a law enforcement officer, or other person sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state, using an electric bicycle while in the performance of the officer's duties. (D)(1) No person under sixteen years of age shall operate a class 3 electric bicycle; however, a person under sixteen years of age may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers. (2) No person shall operate or be a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle unless the person is wearing a protective helmet that meets the standards established by the consumer product safety commission or the American society for testing and materials. (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever operates an electric bicycle in a manner that is prohibited under division (C) of this section and whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) The offenses established under division (E)(1) of this section are strict liability offenses and strict liability is a culpable mental state for purposes of section 2901.20 of the Revised Code. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (F) The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of public safety, shall do all of the following: (1) Maintain a summary of the Ohio laws governing the operation and use of electric bicycles; (2) Create videos that explain general traffic rules for operators of electric bicycles; (3) Publish both the summary and the videos on each department's respective web site; (4) Design and distribute to electric bicycle retail sellers and driver training schools, either on paper or electronically, an educational leaflet or pamphlet that does all of the following: (a) Briefly outlines Ohio laws for electric bicycle operators on the road; (b) Distinguishes between an electric bicycle and other similar forms of transportation, including a motorized bicycle or moped, a motor-driven cycle or scooter, an off-highway motorcycle, a motorcycle, and a mini-bike; (c) Contains a link to the summary and training videos available on the department web sites as described in division (F)(3) of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 4507.11, 4508.02, and 4511.522 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. (A)(1) Beginning not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, the Director of Public Safety shall conduct a study of the following: (a) The types of electric bicycles, motorized bicycles or mopeds, motor-driven cycles or scooters, off-highway motorcycles, motorcycles, and mini-bikes that are available for purchase at retail, the definitions and classifications for such vehicles in the Revised Code, and whether the Revised Code should be amended to accurately reflect the modern uses and operation of such vehicles; (b) The benefits and challenges of implementing additional statewide safety training or requirements for riders of Class 3 electric bicycles, off-highway motorcycles, and mini-bikes, with consideration to existing statutes and the governance of those vehicles by local authorities; (c) Any other safety considerations for electric bicycle, off-highway motorcycle, and mini-bike operators as determined by the Director. (2) In conducting the study, the Director may consider electric bicycle, off-highway motorcycle, and mini-bike regulations and registration laws in other states or in local jurisdictions within Ohio. (B) Not later than three months after the effective date of this section, the Director shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations for the study conducted under division (A) of this section to all of the following: (1) The Governor; (2) The President of the Senate; (3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives; (4) The Minority Leader of the Senate; (5) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.